District of Columbia statutes.
34-2008

Implementation policy.

(a)

In the implementation of this chapter, it shall be the policy of the District government to promote the hiring, education, and training of District residents in every facet of telecommunications endeavor in the District.

(b)

Pursuant to this chapter, it shall be the policy of the District government to promote the utilization of small, disadvantaged, women-owned, and District businesses in the establishment and contracting processes regarding telecommunications in the District.

(c)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to contravene any provision in the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996 passed by the U.S. Congress in January and signed into law by President Clinton in February or to be inconsistent with the findings of the PSC in a proceeding pursuant to § 34-2002(k).

(d)

Two years after June 5, 2008, the People’s Counsel shall issue a report on the effect of the absence of local regulation of Voice Over Internet Protocol Service telecommunications service in the District of Columbia. The report shall be a general analysis of the impacts and effects of the VOIP act on consumers. The report shall also include an examination of the market availability of Voice Over Internet Protocol Service technology to consumers.

Sept. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-154, § 10, 43 DCR 3736
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 52, 45 DCR 745
June 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-165, § 3(d), 55 DCR 5171
The federal Telecommunications Act of 1996, referred to in (c), is Pub. L. 104-104, which is codified throughout Title 47 of the United States Code.
D.C. Law 17-165 added subsec. (d).
1981 Ed., § 43-1458.